Tennessee, session 114, SB1338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter __ of the Public Acts of 2025 (1st Ex. Sess. – SB 6001 / HB
6004), is amended by adding the following as a new section in Section 2:
(a) The office of research and education accountability (OREA) in the office of
the comptroller of the treasury shall annually report the following information about the
program for the current school year:
(1) Number of recipients;
(2) Number of recipients who have participated in the program for two (2)
or more school years;
(3) Number of recipients who were enrolled in a public school in this state
for the immediately preceding school year; and
(4) Number of recipients who were eligible for the first time to enroll in a
public kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) school in this state.
(b) OREA shall submit the report to the general assembly by October 30, 2025,
and by each October 30 thereafter.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1338
002859
- 1 -